Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2475
Bonds; provisions of sections; exclusive.

Bonds may be issued under sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or instrumentality of this state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required therefor by sections 18-2401 to 18-2485, and the validity of and security for any bonds shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any such consent or other proceedings, conditions, or things.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 75.